Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 273A Kentucky Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 12, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.005.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Appropriate court” means the Circuit Court of the county of the Commonwealth in which the unincorporated nonprofit association’s principal office is located or, if none, the county in which the registered office is or was last maintained;

“Established practices” means the practices used by an unincorporated nonprofit association without material change during the most recent five (5) years of its existence or, if it has existed for less than five (5) years, during its entire existence;

“Governing principles” means the agreements, whether oral, in a record, or implied from its established practices, that govern the purpose or operation of an unincorporated nonprofit association and the rights and obligations of its members and manager. The term includes any amendment or restatement of the agreements constituting the governing principles;

“Manager” means a person that is responsible, whether alone or in concert with others, for the management of an unincorporated nonprofit association;

“Member” means a person that, under the governing principles, may participate in the selection of persons authorized to manage the affairs of the unincorporated nonprofit association or in the development of the policies and activities of the association;

“Nonprofit purpose” means any one (1) or more of the following purposes: charitable, benevolent, eleemosynary, educational, civic, patriotic, political, governmental, religious, social, recreational, fraternal, literary, cultural, athletic, scientific, agricultural, horticultural, animal husbandry, and professional, commercial, industrial, or trade association, but shall not include labor unions, cooperative organizations, and organizations subject to any of the provisions of the insurance laws or banking laws of this state which may not be organized under this chapter;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business or statutory trust, estate, donative trust, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, association, limited cooperative association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Statement of authority” means a statement authorizing a person to transfer an interest in real property held in the name of an unincorporated nonprofit association; and

“Unincorporated nonprofit association” means an unincorporated organization consisting of two (2) or more members joined under an agreement that is oral, in a record, or implied from conduct, for one (1) or more common, nonprofit purposes. The term does not include:

A trust;

A marriage, domestic partnership, common law domestic relationship, civil union, or other domestic living arrangement;

An organization formed under any other statute that governs the organization and operation of any person;

A joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or tenancy by the entireties even if the co-owners share use of the property for a nonprofit purpose; or

A relationship under an agreement in a record that expressly provides that the relationship between the parties does not create an unincorporated nonprofit association.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 12, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.010.
Entity — Perpetual existence — Powers.

An unincorporated nonprofit association is a legal entity distinct from its members and managers.

An unincorporated nonprofit association shall have perpetual duration unless the governing principles specify otherwise.

An unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its purposes.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may engage in profit-making activities, but profits from any activities shall be used or set aside for the association’s nonprofit purposes.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 13, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.015
Ownership and transfer of property.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may acquire, hold, encumber, or transfer in its name an interest in real, personal, or intangible property.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may be a beneficiary of a trust or contract, a legatee, or a devisee.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 14, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.020.
Statement of authority as to real property.

An interest in real property held in the name of an unincorporated nonprofit association may be transferred by a person authorized to do so in a statement of authority recorded by the association in the office in the county in which a transfer of the property would be recorded.

A statement of authority shall set forth:

The name of the unincorporated nonprofit association;

The address in this Commonwealth, including the street address, if any, of the association or, if the association does not have an address in this Commonwealth, its out-of-state address;

That the association is an unincorporated nonprofit association;

The name and title or position of a person authorized to transfer an interest in real property held in the name of the association; and

An affirmation by the person executing the statement that they are duly authorized to do so.

A statement of authority shall be executed by a person other than the person authorized in the statement to transfer the interest.

A filing officer may collect a fee for recording a statement of authority in the amount of ten dollars ($10).

A document amending, revoking, or canceling a statement of authority or stating that the statement is unauthorized or erroneous shall meet the requirements for executing and recording an original statement.

Unless canceled earlier, a recorded statement of authority and its most recent amendment expire five (5) years after the date of the most recent recording.

If the record title to real property is in the name of an unincorporated nonprofit association and the statement of authority is recorded in the office of the county in which a transfer of the property would be recorded, the authority of the person named in the statement to transfer is conclusive in favor of a person that gives value without notice that the person lacks authority.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 15, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.025.
Certificate of association.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may file a certificate of association with the Secretary of State containing:

The name of the association meeting the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

;

The mailing address of the association’s initial principal office;

The name and address of the association’s registered agent and registered office, both meeting the requirements of KRS

14A.4-010

; and

A statement of the association’s purpose.

An unincorporated nonprofit association that has filed a certificate of association is thereby subject to KRS

14A.6-010

.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 16, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/13/2016). Subsection (1)(a) of
2015 Ky. Acts ch. 34, sec. 16 (this statute) read “The name of the association meeting the requirements of Section 4 of this Act;”. Section 4 of that Act was
KRS

14A.6-010

, which relates to annual reports filed by business entities. The correct reference should have been to Section 3 of that Act,
KRS

14A.3-010

, which relates to names of business entities. The Reviser of Statutes has changed the citation as codified in subsection (1)(a) of this statute from “KRS

14A.6-010

” to read “KRS

14A.3-010

” to correct this manifest clerical or typographical error under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(h).

273A.030.
Liability for association debts and obligations.

If the association has filed a certificate of association with the Secretary of State, a debt, obligation, or other liability of an unincorporated nonprofit association, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise accruing or arising after the filing of the certificate is:

Solely the debt, obligation, or other liability of the association; and

Not a debt, obligation, or other liability of a member or manager solely because the member acts as a member or the manager acts as a manager.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not affect the liability of a member or manager of an association for his or her own negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 17, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.035.
Power to sue or be sued.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may sue or be sued in its own name.

A member or manager may assert a claim the member or manager has against the unincorporated nonprofit association. An association may assert a claim it has against a member or manager.

If the unincorporated nonprofit association has filed a statement of association and the claim accrued on or after the effective date thereof, a member or manager in an association is not a proper party to a proceeding to enforce that claim solely by reason of being a member or manager.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 18, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.040.
Judgement against association.

A judgment or order against an unincorporated nonprofit association is not by itself a judgment or order against a member or manager.

Pursuant to this chapter, a judgment creditor of an unincorporated nonprofit association shall not levy execution against the assets of a member to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the association unless:

A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the association and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

The association is a debtor in bankruptcy;

The member has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust association assets; or

Liability is imposed on the member by law or contract independent of the existence of the association.

Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to any judgment or order for which the members are not liable in accordance with KRS 273A.030(1).

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 19, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 193, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

273A.045.
Service of process.

In an action or proceeding against an unincorporated nonprofit association, process may be served on the registered agent or in any other manner authorized by the law of this Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 20, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.050.
Action or proceeding not abated by change.

An action or proceeding against an unincorporated nonprofit association shall not abate merely because of a change in its members or managers.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 21, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.055.
Venue.

Venue of an action against an unincorporated nonprofit association that has filed a certificate of association shall be in the appropriate court.

Venue of an action brought in this Commonwealth against an unincorporated nonprofit association that has not filed a certificate of association shall be brought in accordance with the law applicable to an action brought in this Commonwealth against a general partnership.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 22, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.060.
Member not an agent.

A member is not an agent of the association solely by reason of being a member.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 23, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.065.
Approval by members.

Except as otherwise provided in the governing principles, an unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the approval of its members to:

Admit, suspend, dismiss, or expel a member;

Select or dismiss a manager;

Adopt, amend, or repeal the governing principles;

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the association’s property, with or without the association’s goodwill, outside the ordinary course of its activities;

Dissolve under KRS 273A.125(1)(b);

Undertake any other act outside the ordinary course of the association’s activities; or

Determine the policy and purposes of the association.

An unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the approval of the members to do any other act or exercise a right that the governing principles require to be approved by members.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 24, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.070.
Member meetings — Procedural requirements.

Unless the governing principles of a corporation provide otherwise:

Approval of a matter by members requires an affirmative majority of the votes cast at a meeting of members; and

Each member is entitled to one (1) vote on each matter that is submitted for approval by members.

Notice and quorum requirements for member meetings and the conduct of meetings of members shall be determined by the governing principles.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 25, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.075.
Duties of members.

A member shall not have a fiduciary duty to an unincorporated nonprofit association or to another member solely by being a member.

A member shall discharge any duties to the unincorporated nonprofit association and the other members and exercise any rights under this chapter consistent with the governing principles and the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 26, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.080.
Admission, suspension, dismissal, or expulsion.

A person becomes a member and may be suspended, dismissed, or expelled in accordance with the association’s governing principles. If there are no applicable governing principles, a person may become a member or be suspended, dismissed, or expelled from an association only by a vote of its members. A person shall not be admitted as a member without the person’s consent.

Unless the governing principles provide otherwise, the suspension, dismissal, or expulsion of a member shall not relieve the member from any unpaid capital contribution, dues, assessments, fees, or other obligation incurred or commitment made by the member before the suspension, dismissal, or expulsion.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 27, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.085.
Member resignation.

A member may resign as a member in accordance with the governing principles. In the absence of applicable governing principles, a member may resign at any time.

Unless the governing principles provide otherwise, resignation of a member shall not relieve the member from any unpaid capital contribution, dues, assessments, fees, or other obligation incurred or commitment made by the member before resignation.

The governing principles may impose reasonable limitations upon the access to or use of any record of or information with respect to the unincorporated nonprofit association. Except as to limitations set forth in governing principles to which the member or manager requesting information has assented, the association bears the burden of proof in demonstrating the reasonableness of any restrictions imposed.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 28, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.090.
Membership interest not transferable.

Except as otherwise provided in the governing principles of the association, a member’s interest or any right under the governing principles is not transferable.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 29, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2015). During codification of 2015 Ky. Acts ch. 34, Sec. 29 (this statute), the Reviser of Statutes has changed the word “corporation” to “association.” KRS Chapter 273A, dealing with unincorporated nonprofit associations, was created in that Act, and Section 29 of that Act was created as a new section of the new chapter. It is clear from the context that the reference to “corporation” in Section 29 of that Act was intended to be “association.” The Reviser of Statutes has corrected this manifest clerical or typographical error under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h).

273A.095.
Selection of managers — Management rights of managers.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or the governing principles:

Only the members may select a manager or managers;

A manager may be a member or a nonmember;

If a manager is not selected, all members are managers;

Each manager has equal rights in the management and conduct of the association’s activities;

All matters relating to the association’s activities shall be decided by its managers except for matters reserved for approval by members in KRS

273A.065

; and

A difference among managers shall be decided by a majority of the managers.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 30, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.100.
Duties of managers.

A manager owes to the unincorporated nonprofit association the fiduciary duties of loyalty and care.

A manager shall manage the unincorporated nonprofit association in good faith, in a manner the manager honestly believes to be in the best interests of the association, and with such care, including reasonable inquiry, as a prudent person would reasonably exercise in a similar position and under similar circumstances. A manager may rely in good faith upon any opinion, report, statement, or other information provided by another person that the manager reasonably believes is a competent and reliable source for the information.

After full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty by a manager may be authorized or ratified by a majority of the members that are not interested directly or indirectly in the act or transaction.

A manager that makes a business judgment in good faith satisfies the duties specified in subsection (1) of this section if the manager:

Is not interested, directly or indirectly, in the subject of the business judgment and is otherwise able to exercise independent judgment;

Is informed with respect to the subject of the business judgment to the extent the manager reasonably believes to be appropriate under the circumstances; and

Believes that the business judgment is in the best interests of the unincorporated nonprofit association and in accordance with its purposes.

The governing principles in a record may limit or eliminate the liability of a manager to the unincorporated nonprofit association or its members for damages for any action taken, or for failure to take any action, as a manager, except liability for:

The amount of financial benefit improperly received by a manager;

An intentional infliction of harm on the association or one (1) or more of its members;

An intentional violation of criminal law;

Breach of the duty of loyalty; or

Improper distributions.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 31, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.105.
Procedural requirements for managers.

Notice and quorum requirements for meetings of managers and the conduct of meetings of managers shall be determined by the governing principles.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 32, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.110.
Right of member or manager to information.

On reasonable notice and for a proper purpose, a member or manager of an unincorporated nonprofit association may inspect and copy during the unincorporated nonprofit association’s regular operating hours, at a reasonable location specified by the association, any record maintained by the association regarding its activities, financial condition, and other circumstances, to the extent the information is material to the member’s or manager’s rights and duties under the governing principles.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may charge a person that makes a demand under this section reasonable copying costs, limited to the costs of labor and materials.

The governing principles may impose reasonable limitations upon the inspection and use of any record of or information with respect to an unincorporated nonprofit association. Except as to limitations set forth in written governing principles to which a member or manager requesting information has assented, the association bears the burden of proof in demonstrating the reasonableness of any restrictions imposed.

A former member or manager shall be entitled to information to which the member or manager was entitled while a member or manager if the information pertains to the period during which the person was a member or manager, the former member or manager seeks the information in good faith, and the former member or manager satisfies subsections (1) to (3) of this section.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 33, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.115.
Distribution prohibited — Compensation and other permitted payments.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, an unincorporated nonprofit association shall not pay dividends or make distributions to a member or manager.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may:

Pay reasonable compensation or reimburse reasonable expenses to a member or manager for services rendered;

Confer benefits on a member or manager in conformity with its nonprofit purposes;

Repurchase a membership and repay a capital contribution made by a member to the extent authorized by its governing principles; or

Make distributions of property to members upon winding up and termination to the extent permitted by KRS

273A.130

.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 34, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.120.
Reimbursement — Indemnification — Advancement — Insurance.

Except as otherwise provided in the governing principles, an unincorporated nonprofit association shall reimburse a member or manager for authorized expenses reasonably incurred in the course of the member’s or manager’s activities on behalf of the association.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may indemnify a member or manager for any debt, obligation, or other liability incurred in the course of the member’s or manager’s activities on behalf of the association if the person seeking indemnification has complied with KRS

273A.075

and KRS

273A.100

, as applicable. Governing principles in a record may broaden or limit indemnification.

If a person is made or threatened to be made a party in an action based on that person’s activities on behalf of an unincorporated nonprofit association and the person makes a request in a record to the association, a majority of the disinterested managers may approve in a record advance payment, or reimbursement, by the association, of all or a part of the reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and costs, incurred by the person before the final disposition of the proceeding. To be entitled to an advance payment or reimbursement, the person shall state in a record that the person has a good faith belief that the criteria for indemnification in subsection (2) of this section have been satisfied and that the person will repay the amounts advanced or reimbursed if the criteria for payment have not been satisfied. The governing principles in a record may broaden or limit the advance payments or reimbursements.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may purchase insurance on behalf of a member or manager for liability asserted against or incurred by the member or manager in the capacity of a member or manager, whether or not the association has authority under this chapter to reimburse, indemnify, or advance expenses to the member or manager against the liability.

The rights of reimbursement, indemnification, and advancement of expenses under this section apply to a former member or manager for an activity undertaken on behalf of the unincorporated nonprofit association while a member or manager.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 35, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.125.
Dissolution.

An unincorporated nonprofit association may be dissolved as follows:

If the governing principles provide a time or method for dissolution, at that time or by that method;

If the governing principles do not provide a time or method for dissolution, upon approval by the members;

If no member can be located and the association’s operations have been discontinued for at least three (3) years, by the managers or, if the association has no current manager, by its last manager;

By court order; or

Under law other than this chapter.

After dissolution, an unincorporated nonprofit association continues in existence until its activities have been wound up and it is terminated pursuant to KRS

273A.130

.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 36, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.130.
Winding up and termination.

Winding up and termination of an unincorporated nonprofit association shall proceed in accordance with the following rules:

All known debts and liabilities shall be paid or adequately provided for;

Any property subject to a condition requiring return to the person designated by the donor shall be transferred to that person;

Any property subject to a trust shall be distributed in accordance with the trust agreement; and

Any remaining property shall be distributed as follows:

As required by law other than this chapter that requires assets of an association to be distributed to another person with similar nonprofit purposes;

In accordance with the association’s governing principles or, in the absence of applicable governing principles, to the members of the association per capita or as the members direct; or

If neither paragraph (a) nor (b) of this subsection applies, as directed by the appropriate court.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 37, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.135.
Transition concerning real and personal property.

If, before June 24, 2015, an interest in property was by terms of a transfer purportedly transferred to an unincorporated nonprofit association but under the law of this Commonwealth the interest did not vest in the association, or in one (1) or more persons on behalf of the association under subsection (2) of this section, on June 24, 2015, the interest vests in the association, unless the parties to the transfer have treated the transfer as ineffective.

If, before June 24, 2015, an interest in property was by terms of a transfer purportedly transferred to an unincorporated nonprofit association but the interest was vested in one (1) or more persons to hold the interest for or on behalf of the association or the members of the association, on or after June 24, 2015, the persons, or their successors in interest, may transfer the interest to the association in its name, or the association may require that the interest be transferred to it in its name.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 38, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.140.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 39, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.145.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, modify, limit, and supersede the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 7001

et. seq., but this chapter does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that Act.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 40, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.150.
Relation to other law.

Principles of law and equity supplement this chapter unless displaced by a particular provision of it.

A statute governing a specific type of unincorporated nonprofit association prevails over an inconsistent provision in this chapter, to the extent of the inconsistency.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 41, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.155.
Governing law.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the laws of this Commonwealth govern the operation in this state of all unincorporated nonprofit associations formed or operating in this Commonwealth.

Unless the governing principles specify a different jurisdiction, the law of the jurisdiction in which a foreign unincorporated nonprofit association has its principal place of activities governs the internal affairs of the association.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 42, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.160.
Savings clause.

The provisions of this chapter do not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before it takes effect.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 43, effective June 24, 2015.

273A.165.
Title.

KRS Chapter 273A shall be known and may be cited as the Kentucky Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 44, effective June 24, 2015.